Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-629
Children born out of wedlock; legitimized; birth certificate; copies; issuance; inspection; when authorized.

A certified copy or copies of the certificate of birth of any such legitimized child may be furnished upon request by the department. The evidence upon which the new certificate is made may be furnished upon request to a parent of such legitimized child or to the legitimized child if such child is nineteen years of age or older. The evidence upon which the new certificate is made shall be available for inspection by any other person only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction, and the original certificate of birth shall be available for inspection only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1945, c. 173, § 2, p. 553;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 541;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 161;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 435.